Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 11. Intensive Supervision Program

§ 7-13-1101.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Department” means the department of corrections;

“Intensive supervision program” means a program established under W.S.

7-13-1102

which allows participants to live or work in the community under close supervision methods;

“Validated risk-need assessment” means an actuarial assessment tool that assesses the dynamic and static factors that drive criminal behavior. The validated risk-need assessment shall determine a person’s risk to reoffend and the needs of a person that, when addressed, would reduce the risk to reoffend.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 103, § 1; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Stated

in

Umbach v. State, 2002 WY 42, 42 P.3d 1006,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Cohee v. State, 2005 WY 50, 110 P.3d 267,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(2005); Butler v. State, 2014 WY 115,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Sept. 16, 2014).

§ 7-13-1102.
Authority to establish programs; rulemaking authority.

The department is authorized to adopt reasonable rules and regulations to establish an intensive supervision program for probationers and parolees.

An intensive supervision program established under this article may require:

Electronic monitoring, regimented daily schedules or itineraries, house arrest, telephone contact, drug testing, curfew checks or other supervision methods which facilitate contact with supervisory personnel;

Community service work, family, educational or vocational counseling, cognitive-behavioral programming to address criminal thinking, treatment for substance abuse, mental health treatment and monitoring of restitution orders and fines previously imposed on the participant. For purposes of this paragraph, cognitive-behavioral programming means as defined in W.S. 7-13-1801(c)(i); and

Imposition of supervision fees to be paid by participants.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the department may, by negotiation without competitive bid or by competitive bidding, contract with any governmental or nongovernmental entity to provide services required to carry out the provisions of this article.

The department shall have general supervisory authority over all probationers and parolees participating in a program under this article.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 103, § 1; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(ii), added "cognitive-behavioral programming to address criminal thinking" following "vocational counseling," and added the second sentence.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Cited in

Butler v. State, 2014 WY 115,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Sept. 16, 2014).

Quoted

in

Umbach v. State, 2002 WY 42, 42 P.3d 1006,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Moehr v. State, 13 P.3d 1114,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 7-13-1103.
Program participation not a matter of right.

Participation in a program authorized by this article is a matter of grace and not of right.

No person shall be allowed to participate in a program authorized by this article unless the person agrees in writing to abide by all the rules and regulations of the department relating to the operation of the program and agrees to submit to the incentives and sanctions which may be imposed under W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 103, § 1; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), substituted "the incentives and sanctions" for "administrative sanctions" and "W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

" for "W.S.

7-13-1107

."

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Application. —

If the State decides that a probationer who has violated a program rule should be subjected to administrative sanctions, then it shall not also seek probation revocation for that violation. Umbach v. State, 2002 WY 42, 42 P.3d 1006,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Moehr v. State, 13 P.3d 1114,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 7-13-1104.
Program participation as a condition of parole.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the state board of parole may, as a condition of parole, require a parolee who is assessed through a validated risk-need assessment as a high risk for reoffending or violating a condition of parole to participate in a program established under this article, provided:

Space and funding is available for the parolee’s participation in the program; and

The department determines the person has a reasonable likelihood of successfully participating in the program.

Placement of a parolee in a program established under W.S.

7-13-1102

as a sanction under W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

or following a modification or revocation of parole shall not require the parolee to be assessed through a validated risk-need assessment as a high risk for reoffending or violating a condition of parole.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 103, § 1; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 18, § 1, effective March 9, 2020.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added "who is assessed through a validated risk-need assessment as a high risk for reoffending or violating a condition of parole" following "parolee."

The 2020 amendment,

in (a), added “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section,”; and added (b).

Laws 2020, ch. 18, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2020.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

§ 7-13-1105.
Placement of probationer in program by sentencing court.

A sentencing court may, as a condition of probation, order that a defendant who has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to or has been convicted of a felony, or any offense defined by subsection (c) of this section, participate in a program established under this article, provided:

Space is available in the program;

The probationer agrees to participate in the program;

The department determines the person has a reasonable likelihood of successfully participating in the program; and

The legislature has specifically appropriated funds or other unencumbered funds are available to pay for the probationer’s participation in the program.

When a presentence report is required by the court, the department shall be responsible for including in the presentence report to the sentencing judge any recommendations for the utilization of a program created under this article.

Subject to the conditions specified in paragraphs (a)(i) through (iv) of this section, participation in a program established under this article may be ordered for a defendant who has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to or has been convicted of a violation of W.S.

6-2-510

or

6-2-511

or a violation of W.S.

6-4-404

, or 6-2-504(a) or (b) if the defendant and the victim are household members as defined by W.S. 35-21-102(a)(iv).

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a defendant shall not be placed in a program established under W.S.

7-13-1102

unless the defendant receives a validated risk-need assessment and scores as a high risk for reoffending or for violating conditions of probation except that a defendant may be placed in a program established under W.S.

7-13-1102

for good cause shown upon the record.

Placement of a probationer in a program established under W.S.

7-13-1102

as a sanction under W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

or following a revocation of probation shall not require the probationer to be assessed through a validated risk-need assessment as a high risk for reoffending or violating a condition of probation.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 103, § 1; 2001, ch. 89, § 1; 2014 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 18, § 1, effective March 9, 2020.

The 2014 amendment,

efective July 1, 2014, in (c), substituted “paragraphs” for “subsection”, inserted “6-2-510 or

6-2-511

or a violation of W.S.”, and deleted “or a violation of W.S. 6-2-501(a), (b), (e) or (f)(i).”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, added (d).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, added “When a presentence report is required by the court” at the beginning of (b).

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Stated

in

Moehr v. State, 13 P.3d 1114,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 2000).

The 2020 amendment

, in (d), added “Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a”; and added (e).

Laws 2020, ch. 18, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2020.

§ 7-13-1106.
Program participation as an alternative to probation or parole revocation. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 103, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 116, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 7-13-1107.
Administrative rewards and sanctions for program violations.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 116, § 3.

Probationers and parolees who violate the rules and restrictions of an intensive supervision program established under this article shall be sanctioned in accordance with W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

or may be subject to revocation proceedings.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 103, § 1; 1999, ch. 174, § 1; 2011, ch. 30, § 1; 2018 ch. 75, § 1, effective March 12, 2018; 2019 ch. 116, §§
2, 3, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to placement of an offender in a residential community correctional program for a rules violation, see §

7-18-108

.

As to assignment of a parolee to a residential community correctional program for a rules violation, see §

7-18-115

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (c), substituted “amount established by the department based on funds appropriated for housing of offenders” for “daily cost of keeping an inmate at the Wyoming state penitentiary.”

The 2018 amendment,

in (a), inserted “rewards for positive behavior and” and added “or the conditions of probation or parole” at the end; and added (b)(iii)(C), (D), and (E).

Laws 2018, ch. 75, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2018.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment by ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, added (e).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 116 § 3, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a) through (d), which authorized administrative sanctions for program violations.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Effect on probation revocation. —

When an intensive supervision program participant violates the program rules and regulations, the State is required to choose between subjecting that participant to administrative sanctions under the statute or revoking the participant's probation; if the State decides that a probationer who has violated a program rule should be subjected to administrative sanctions, then it must not also seek probation revocation for that violation. Butler v. State, 2014 WY 115, 334 P.3d 147,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2014).

This section did not permit the State to both revoke defendant's probation and subject him to administrative sanctions. The district court erred when it granted the State's petition to revoke probation because the violations contained in the petition had already been subject to administrative sanctions. Butler v. State, 2014 WY 115, 334 P.3d 147,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2014).

In the context of an intensive supervision program, if the State decides that a probationer who has violated a program rule should be subjected to administrative sanctions, then it shall not also seek probation revocation for that violation. The State may, however, forgo administrative sanctions and file a petition for probation revocation with the sentencing court. Umbach v. State, 2002 WY 42, 42 P.3d 1006,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2002).

Because the State did not impose administrative sanctions for defendant's violations of the conditions of the intensive supervision program, and, instead, sought probation revocation, defendant had not already been administratively sanctioned for the violations the district court relied on in revoking his probation. Allaback v. State, 2014 WY 27, 318 P.3d 827,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2014).